Nebraska, session 109, LB636.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB636 LB636
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) County board means the county board or the county board of
corrections;
(b) Eligible medical costs means the actual cost to a county for
providing medical services to county jail inmates; and
(c) Inmate means a person sentenced to or confined in a county jail,
including, but not limited to, any person serving a custodial sanction
imposed in response to a violation of probation, parole, or post-release
supervision.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2025, the Jail Standards Board shall reimburse
each county for eligible medical costs, except that if state
appropriations are not sufficient to satisfy all of the eligible medical
cost claims filed during any quarterly fiscal period, then the board
shall prorate each county's total reimbursement for that quarterly fiscal
period in proportion to the remaining appropriation.
(3) Any medical cost claims paid by the Jail Standards Board on a
prorated basis shall not be refiled.
(4) Subject to available appropriations, the Jail Standards Board
shall reimburse all counties on a quarterly basis for all eligible
medical court cost claims as soon as practicable after the end of each
quarterly filing period.
(5)(a) The county board shall request reimbursement by submitting
documentation for the claim in a form and manner prescribed by the Jail
Standards Board. The claim shall be sworn to by a designated
representative of the county board before the clerk of the county and
certified to under his or her seal.
(b) Claims filed for any quarter of a fiscal year shall only be paid
out of the same fiscal year's appropriation, including any amounts
reappropriated or certified as encumbrances for such reimbursement
assistance, but no previous fiscal year claims shall be paid or filed by
counties to be paid from a subsequent fiscal year's new appropriation
-2-

LB636 LB636
2025 2025
established for such reimbursement assistance.
(c) Reimbursement claims, as certified by each county board, shall
be received by the Jail Standards Board within forty-five days after the
end of any quarterly fiscal period ending on March 31, June 30, September
30, and December 31. Any claims not meeting these deadlines shall be
determined ineligible for future filing and shall not be reimbursed by
the state.
(d) If the Jail Standards Board determines a claim should be paid,
the board shall request that a warrant be drawn upon the State Treasurer
for the amount due to the county treasurer of the county, and the amount
drawn shall be credited to the general fund of the county.
(6) The Jail Standards Board may request or obtain additional
information to determine if a claim is accurate. The Jail Standards Board
shall have the sole authority to determine the amount of actual costs
that are reimbursable as eligible medical costs.
(7) For purposes of substantiating a claim, the Jail Standards Board
may audit the records and reports of a county relating to the county's
claim for reimbursement. The Jail Standards Board shall audit such
records and reports once every two years or as otherwise deemed necessary
by the Jail Standards Board. The county board shall keep the records
pertaining to a claim for two years after the date the claim is submitted
to the Jail Standards Board.
(8) The Jail Standards Board shall not reimburse a county for any
costs of medical services made necessary by the negligence, recklessness,
or intentional misconduct of a county jail or any employee or official of
the county jail or county.
(9) The Jail Standards Board may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
(10) For fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter, the
total annual appropriations approved by the Legislature for the Jail
Standards Board for eligible criminal court cost reimbursement shall not
-3-

LB636 LB636
2025 2025
exceed twenty-one million dollars.
Sec. 2. Section 33-117, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
33-117 (1) The several sheriffs shall charge and collect fees at the
rates specified in this section. The rates shall be as follows: (a)
Serving a capias with commitment or bail bond and return, twenty-five two
dollars; (b) serving a search warrant, twenty-five two dollars; (c)
arresting under a search warrant, twenty-five two dollars for each person
so arrested; (d) unless otherwise specifically listed in subdivisions (f)
through (s) of this subsection, serving a summons, subpoena, order of
attachment, order of replevin, other order of the court, notice of
motion, other notice, other writ or document, or any combination thereof,
including any accompanying or attached documents, twenty-five twelve
dollars for each person served , except that when more than one person is
served at the same time and location in the same case, the service fee
shall be twelve dollars for the first person served at that time and
location and three dollars for each other person served at that time and
location; (e) making a return of each summons, subpoena, order of
attachment, order of replevin, other order of the court, notice of
motion, other notice, or other writ or document, whether served or not,
twenty-five six dollars; (f) taking and filing a replevin bond or other
indemnification to be furnished and approved by the sheriff, twenty-five
dollars one dollar; (g) making a copy of any process, bond, or other
paper not otherwise provided for in this section, thirty-five twenty-five
cents per page; (h) traveling each mile actually and necessarily traveled
within or without their several counties in their official duties, three
cents more per mile than the rate provided in section 81-1176 , except
that the minimum fee shall be fifty cents when the service is made within
one mile of the courthouse, and, as far as is expedient, all papers in
the hands of the sheriff at any one time shall be served in one or more
trips by the most direct route or routes and only one mileage fee shall
-4-

LB636 LB636
2025 2025
be charged for a single trip, the total mileage cost to be computed as a
unit for each trip and the combined mileage cost of each trip to be
reasonably prorated among the persons or parties liable for the payment
of same and a minimum fee of ten dollars to each such person or party
liable for payment of the same; (i) levying a writ or a court order and
return thereof, twenty-five eighteen dollars; (j) summoning a grand jury,
not including mileage to be paid by the county, twenty-five ten dollars;
(k) summoning a petit jury, not including mileage to be paid by the
county, twenty-five twelve dollars; (l) summoning a special jury, for
each person impaneled, five dollars fifty cents; (m) calling a jury for a
trial of a case or cause, twenty-five dollars fifty cents; (n) executing
a writ of restitution or a writ of assistance and return, twenty-five
eighteen dollars; (o) calling an inquest to appraise lands and tenements
levied on by execution, twenty-five dollars one dollar; (p) calling an
inquest to appraise goods and chattels taken by an order of attachment or
replevin, twenty-five dollars one dollar; (q) advertising a sale in a
newspaper in addition to the price of printing, twenty-five dollars one
dollar; (r) advertising in writing for a sale of real or personal
property, twenty-five five dollars; and (s) making deeds for land sold on
execution or order of sale, twenty-five five dollars.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, the
commission due a sheriff on an execution or order of sale, an order of
attachment decree, or a sale of real or personal property shall be: For
each dollar not exceeding one hundred thousand four hundred dollars, six
cents; for every dollar above one four hundred thousand dollars and not
exceeding one million thousand dollars, four cents; and for every dollar
above one million thousand dollars, two cents.
(b) In real estate foreclosure, when any party to the original
action purchases the property or when no money is received or disbursed
by the sheriff, the commission shall be computed pursuant to subdivision
(a) of this subsection but shall not exceed two thousand hundred dollars.
-5-

LB636 LB636
2025 2025
(3) The sheriff shall, on the first Tuesday in January, April, July,
and October of each year, make a report to the county board showing (a)
the different items of fees collected, from whom, at what time, and for
what service, (b) the total amount of the fees collected by the officer
since the last report, and (c) the amount collected for the current year.
All fees collected by the sheriff, except mileage fees when the sheriff
or his or her employee is using a personal vehicle, shall be paid to the
county treasurer who shall credit the fees to the general fund of the
county.
(4) Any future adjustment made to the reimbursement rate provided in
subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed to apply to all provisions
of law which refer to this section for the computation of mileage.
(5) All fees collected pursuant to this section, except fees for
mileage accrued in a personal vehicle, by any constable who is a salaried
employee of the State of Nebraska shall be remitted to the clerk of the
county court. The clerk of the county court shall pay the same to the
General Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 77-1720, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1720 (1) All fees allowed for issuing distress warrants, levy,
and return of the warrants, in the cases above provided, shall be twelve
two dollars for issuing each warrant, six dollars one dollar for levy,
and mileage at the rate provided in section 33-117 for county sheriffs
for each mile actually and necessarily traveled by such officer on each
warrant.
(2) When a county sheriff determines that safety concerns exist
requiring the use of more than one officer to serve a warrant, the county
sheriff may charge a fee for each additional officer required, not to
exceed the rates otherwise provided for in this section.
(3) When the officer has more than one warrant in his or her hands
for service, he or she shall charge only for the mileage actually and
-6-

LB636 LB636
2025 2025
necessarily traveled in serving all of the warrants, in which case the
mileage so charged shall be reasonably prorated among such warrants, with
a minimum charge of ten dollars for each warrant served.
(4) Commission shall be allowed in addition on all taxes collected
by distress and sale as follows: On all sums not exceeding one hundred
thousand dollars, ten cents on each dollar; and on all sums exceeding one
hundred thousand dollars, eight cents on each dollar.
(5) All fees, mileage, and commissions shall be taxed to the parties
against whom the distress warrants run and shall be collected as the
original tax.
(6) When the taxes are not collected by distress and sale, the
mileage shall be paid as provided in section 33-117. When mileage has
been paid as provided in section 33-117 and the tax, together with all
fees, mileage, and commission are collected, then the amount collected as
mileage shall be paid to the county treasurer with the fees and
commission and credited by the county treasurer to the general fund of
the county.
Sec. 4. Original section 77-1720, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 33-117, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-